Maryland, session 2026, HB0653.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0653*

HOUSE BILL 653
Article – Tax – General
10–207.
(a) To the extent included in federal adjusted gross income, the amounts under
this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to determine
Maryland adjusted gross income.
(mm) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Correctional officer” means an individual who:
1. was employed in:
A. a State correctional facility, as defined in § 1–101 of the
Correctional Services Article;
B. a local correctional facility, as defined in § 1–101 of the
Correctional Services Article;
C. a juvenile facility included in § 9–226 of the Human
Services Article; or
D. a facility of the United States that is equivalent to a State
or local correctional facility or a juvenile facility included in § 9–226 of the Human Services
Article; and
2. is eligible to receive retirement income attributable to the
individual’s employment under item 1 of this subparagraph.
(iii) “Emergency services personnel” means emergency medical
technicians or paramedics.
(iv) “Employee retirement system” has the meaning stated under §
10–209(a) of this subtitle.
(v) “Public safety employee” means an individual who is a retired
correctional officer, law enforcement officer, or fire, rescue, or emergency services personnel
of the United States, the State, or a political subdivision of the State.
(2) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
subtraction under subsection (a) of this section includes [the first $15,000 of] income from
an employee retirement system that is attributable to service as a public safety employee,
if the income is received by an individual who is at least 55 years old on the last day of the
taxable year.

HOUSE BILL 653 3
(3) THE SUBTRACTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
INCLUDES:
(I) FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31,
2024, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, THE FIRST $15,000 OF INCOME DESCRIBED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(II) FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31,
2025, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, THE FIRST $16,000 OF INCOME DESCRIBED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(III) FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31,
2026, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, THE FIRST $17,000 OF INCOME DESCRIBED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(IV) FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31,
2027, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2029, THE FIRST $18,000 OF INCOME DESCRIBED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(V) FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31,
2028, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2030, THE FIRST $19,000 OF INCOME DESCRIBED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(VI) FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31,
2029, THE FIRST $20,000 OF INCOME DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.